Hawaii statutes.
§431:14A-102 Definitions. As used in
this article:

"Administrator" means the chief
executive officer of the Hawaii employers' mutual insurance company.

"Board" means the board of directors
of the Hawaii employers' mutual insurance company.

"Company" means the Hawaii employers'
mutual insurance company established by this article.

"Council" means the Hawaii employers'
mutual insurance company oversight council.

"Investment manager" means any
fiduciary, who has been designated by the board to manage, acquire, or dispose
of the company's assets, a bank as defined by law, or an insurance company
qualified to perform services under the laws of more than one state.

"Qualified actuary" means a member of
the American Academy of Actuaries who is either a fellow of the Casualty
Actuarial Society or an Associate of the Casualty Actuarial Society who has
five or more years of experience. [L 1996, c 261, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 252,
§3; am L 2010, c 52, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next